bbl_numerals.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMERALS
# 
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

Numerals[-four_numerals]
agrCl Numerals[four_numerals]

LEXICON agrCl

<m><sg>:v
<m><pl>:b
<f><sg>:j
<f><pl>:d
<d>:d
<j>:j
<b>:b

LEXICON Numerals

cħa                                                         # один; one
ši                                                          # два; two
qo                                                          # три; three
dʕivɁ:ʕivɁ[four_numerals]                                   # четыре; four
pxi                                                         # пять; five
jetx                                                        # шесть; six
vorɬ                                                        # семь; seven
barɬ                                                        # восемь; eight
iss                                                         # девять; nine
it't'                                                       # десять; ten
cħait't'                                                    # одиннадцать; eleven
šiit't'                                                     # двeннадцать; twelve
qoit't'                                                     # триннадцать; thirteen
dʕevɁet't':ʕevɁet't'[four_numerals]                         # четырнадцать; fourteen
pxiit't'                                                    # пятнадцать; fifteen
jetxet't'                                                   # шестнадцать; sixteen
vorɬet't'                                                   # семнадцать; seventeen
barɬet’t’                                                   # восемнадцать; eighteen
t'q'exc'                                                    # девятнадцать; nineteen
t'q'a                                                       # двадцать; twenty
